Tennessee, session 114, SB1864.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-103(a), is amended by
deleting "This chapter does not apply to:" and substituting "The following persons are not
required to obtain a license or registration, unless otherwise stated in this chapter:".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-103(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) A reserve officer/deputy, part-time officer/deputy, or auxiliary officer/deputy
who meets or exceeds all training requirements established in § 62-35-118, as required
for the type of security services or location where the officer or deputy is providing
services. An officer or deputy claiming this exemption from registration must complete
biannual training equivalent to the refresher training requirements in § 62-35-122, as
determined by the commissioner. If an officer or deputy claiming this exemption has not
completed, as appropriate, either the training required by § 62-35-118 or the biannual
refresher training required by § 62-35-122 in the immediately preceding two-year period,
then the officer or deputy shall not provide security services under this exemption until
the individual recompletes training that meets or exceeds all training requirements
established in § 62-35-118, as required for the type of security services or location
where the officer or deputy is providing services.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-117(2), is amended by
deleting "resident" and substituting "qualified".
SB1864
011268
- 1 -

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-117(4)(B), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Stalking;
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-117, is amended by adding
the following as new subdivisions:
( ) Not be on any abuse registry maintained in this state or any other state; an
individual who is on an abuse registry in this state or another state is disqualified from
being able to obtain any license or registration listed in this chapter for as long as the
individual is on such registry;
( ) Not have an order of protection, bond condition, conviction, or any other
action that prohibits the individual from possessing any firearm; an individual who has an
order of protection, bond condition, conviction, or any other action that prohibits the
individual from possessing a firearm is disqualified from holding an armed security
guard/officer registration for as long as the individual is subject to such prohibition;
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-118(d), is amended by
deleting subdivisions (3) and (4) and substituting:
(3) The requirements of subsections (a) and (b) do not apply to an applicant for
registration who is a sworn peace officer and certified by the peace officer standards and
training commission.
(4) The requirements of subsection (a) do not apply to an applicant for
registration who is a state or local correctional officer or jailer; provided, that the state
officer has successfully completed the appropriate basic training required by § 41-1-116
and is current on all annual refresher courses required by § 41-1-116, and the local
officer or jailer has successfully completed comparable basic training and annual in-
service training courses.
- 2 - 011268

SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-120, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting:
(b)
(1)
(A) A security guard/officer shall provide written notice to the
commissioner or the commissioner's designee and to the licensee or the
proprietary security organization that employs the security guard/officer if
the security guard/officer is subject to any arrest or citation for any
offense listed in § 62-35-117.
(B) Such written notice must be provided within ten (10) days of
the arrest or citation, whichever occurs first, and must include a copy of
any charging documents related to the arrest or citation.
(2)
(A) A security guard/officer shall provide written notice to the
commissioner or the commissioner's designee and to the licensee or the
proprietary security organization that employs the security guard/officer if
the security guard/officer is convicted of any offense listed in § 62-35-117.
(B) Such written notice must be provided within ten (10) days of
the conviction and must include a copy of the conviction and any other
relevant court orders related to the conviction and sentencing.
(3)
(A) An armed security guard/officer shall provide written notice to
the commissioner or the commissioner's designee and to the licensee or
the proprietary security organization that employs the security
guard/officer of any arrest, conviction, order of protection, bond
- 3 - 011268

conditions, or any other circumstance that impacts the armed security
guard's/officer's ability to carry a firearm.
(B) Such written notice must be provided within ten (10) days of
any circumstance listed in subdivision (b)(3)(A) and must include a copy
of documents related to the conditions that restrict the armed security
guard's/officer's ability to carry a firearm.
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-122, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(h)
(1) The requirements of subsection (e) do not apply to an unarmed
security guard/officer who has had at least two (2) hours of training determined
by the commissioner to be equivalent to that required by subsection (e) in the
year prior to filing the application.
(2) The requirements of subsection (d) do not apply to an armed security
guard/officer who has had at least four (4) hours of classroom training and
marksmanship training determined by the commissioner to be equivalent to that
required by subsection (d) in the year prior to filing the application.
(3) The requirements of subsections (d) and (e) do not apply to a sworn
peace officer who is actively certified by the peace officer standards and training
commission.
(4) The requirements of subsections (d) and (e) do not apply to a state or
local correctional officer or jailer; provided, that the state officer has successfully
completed the appropriate basic training required by § 41-1-116 and is current on
all annual refresher courses required by § 41-1-116, and the local officer or jailer
- 4 - 011268

has successfully completed comparable basic training and annual in-service
training courses.
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-123, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(b) A proprietary security organization registration or renewal expires two (2)
years from date of issuance.
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-124(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(b)
(1)
(A) A licensee or proprietary security organization shall provide
written notice to the commissioner or the commissioner's designee of any
arrest or citation for any offense listed in § 62-35-117 of:
(i) The licensee or its qualifying agent or manager; or
(ii) Any person employed as a security guard/officer by the
licensee or the proprietary security organization.
(B) Such written notice must be provided within ten (10) days of
the arrest or citation, whichever occurs first, and must include a copy of
any charging documents related to the arrest or citation.
(2)
(A) A licensee or proprietary security organization shall provide
written notice to the commissioner or the commissioner's designee of any
conviction for any offense listed in § 62-35-117 of:
(i) The licensee or its qualifying agent or manager; or
- 5 - 011268

(ii) Any person employed as a security guard/officer by the
licensee or the proprietary security organization.
(B) Such written notice must be provided within ten (10) days of
the conviction and must include a copy of the conviction and any other
relevant court orders related to the conviction and sentencing.
(3)
(A) A licensee or proprietary security organization shall provide
written notice to the commissioner or the commissioner's designee of any
arrest, conviction, order of protection, bond conditions, or any other
circumstance that impacts the ability of an armed security guard/officer
who is employed by the licensee or proprietary security organization to
carry a firearm.
(B) Such written notice must be provided within ten (10) days of
any circumstance listed in subdivision (b)(3)(A) and must include a copy
of documents related to the conditions that restrict the armed security
guard's/officer's ability to carry a firearm.
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-131, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) A municipality, county, or other political subdivision of this state shall not
require a licensee or registrant to obtain any authorization, permit, or license, or to pay
any other fee or post a bond, to engage in any business or activity regulated under this
chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a municipality, county, or other political
subdivision of this state may impose:
(1) A bona fide business tax; and
- 6 - 011268

(2) Regulations upon any person who furnishes street patrol services,
including a requirement that the person register with a designated agency.
SECTION 12. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-133, is amended by deleting
the section.
SECTION 13. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-134, is amended by deleting
subdivision (c)(2).
SECTION 14. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-134, is amended by deleting
subdivision (c)(5) and substituting:
(5) Make any statement, innuendo, or insinuation, or take any action, that would
reasonably cause another person to believe that the security guard/officer functions as a
law enforcement officer or other government official; or
SECTION 15. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-141, is amended by deleting
subdivision (b)(2) and substituting:
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1), a law enforcement officer may wear the
law enforcement officer's jurisdiction's uniform, if the jurisdiction has authorized its
officers to do so.
SECTION 16. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-141, is amended by deleting
subsections (a) and (c).
SECTION 17. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 62, Chapter 35, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
62-35-137. Review of training.
An individual may submit training or continuing education to be reviewed and
approved by the commissioner for any requirements listed in this chapter. The
commissioner may set a reasonable fee for the review of the training or continuing
education courses.
- 7 - 011268

SECTION 18. The heading in this act is for reference purposes only and does not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the heading in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 19. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 8 - 011268